sanskrit-hyphenation.tex
\begingroup
\language\mysanskrit
\patterns{
1b2a
1b2e
1b2h2a
1b2h2e
1b2h2i
1b2h2l2a
1b2h2l2e
1b2h2l2i
1b2h2l2ḷ
1b2h2l2l̥
1b2h2l2o
1b2h2l2ṛ
1b2h2l2r̥
1b2h2l2u
1b2h2l2à
1b2h2l2á
1b2h2l2è
1b2h2l2é
1b2h2l2ì
1b2h2l2í
1b2h2l2ò
1b2h2l2ó
1b2h2l2ù
1b2h2l2ú
1b2h2l2ā
1b2h2l2ī
1b2h2l2ĺ̥
1b2h2l2ŕ̥
1b2h2l2ū
1b2h2l2ḷ
1b2h2l2ḹ
1b2h2l2ṛ
1b2h2l2ṝ
1b2h2ḷ
1b2h2l̥
1b2h2o
1b2h2r2a
1b2h2r2e
1b2h2r2i
1b2h2r2ḷ
1b2h2r2l̥
1b2h2r2o
1b2h2r2ṛ
1b2h2r2r̥
1b2h2r2u
1b2h2r2à
1b2h2r2á
1b2h2r2è
1b2h2r2é
1b2h2r2ì
1b2h2r2í
1b2h2r2ò
1b2h2r2ó
1b2h2r2ù
1b2h2r2ú
1b2h2r2ā
1b2h2r2ī
1b2h2r2ĺ̥
1b2h2r2ŕ̥
1b2h2r2ū
1b2h2r2ḷ
1b2h2r2ḹ
1b2h2r2ṛ
1b2h2r2ṝ
1b2h2ṛ
1b2h2r̥
1b2h2u
1b2h2v2a
1b2h2v2e
1b2h2v2i
1b2h2v2ḷ
1b2h2v2l̥
1b2h2v2o
1b2h2v2ṛ
1b2h2v2r̥
1b2h2v2u
1b2h2v2à
1b2h2v2á
1b2h2v2è
1b2h2v2é
1b2h2v2ì
1b2h2v2í
1b2h2v2ò
1b2h2v2ó
1b2h2v2ù
1b2h2v2ú
1b2h2v2ā
1b2h2v2ī
1b2h2v2ĺ̥
1b2h2v2ŕ̥
1b2h2v2ū
1b2h2v2ḷ
1b2h2v2ḹ
1b2h2v2ṛ
1b2h2v2ṝ
1b2h2y2a
1b2h2y2e
1b2h2y2i
1b2h2y2ḷ
1b2h2y2l̥
1b2h2y2o
1b2h2y2ṛ
1b2h2y2r̥
1b2h2y2u
1b2h2y2à
1b2h2y2á
1b2h2y2è
1b2h2y2é
1b2h2y2ì
1b2h2y2í
1b2h2y2ò
1b2h2y2ó
1b2h2y2ù
1b2h2y2ú
1b2h2y2ā
1b2h2y2ī
1b2h2y2ĺ̥
1b2h2y2ŕ̥
1b2h2y2ū
1b2h2y2ḷ
1b2h2y2ḹ
1b2h2y2ṛ
1b2h2y2ṝ
1b2h2à
1b2h2á
1b2h2è
1b2h2é
1b2h2ì
1b2h2í
1b2h2ò
1b2h2ó
1b2h2ù
1b2h2ú
1b2h2ā
1b2h2ī
1b2h2ĺ̥
1b2h2ŕ̥
1b2h2ū
1b2h2ḷ
1b2h2ḹ
1b2h2ṛ
1b2h2ṝ
1b2i
1b2l2a
1b2l2e
1b2l2i
1b2l2ḷ
1b2l2l̥
1b2l2o
1b2l2ṛ
1b2l2r̥
1b2l2u
1b2l2à
1b2l2á
1b2l2è
1b2l2é
1b2l2ì
1b2l2í
1b2l2ò
1b2l2ó
1b2l2ù
1b2l2ú
1b2l2ā
1b2l2ī
1b2l2ĺ̥
1b2l2ŕ̥
1b2l2ū
1b2l2ḷ
1b2l2ḹ
1b2l2ṛ
1b2l2ṝ
1b2ḷ
1b2l̥
1b2o
1b2r2a
1b2r2e
1b2r2i
1b2r2ḷ
1b2r2l̥
1b2r2o
1b2r2ṛ
1b2r2r̥
1b2r2u
1b2r2à
1b2r2á
1b2r2è
1b2r2é
1b2r2ì
1b2r2í
1b2r2ò
1b2r2ó
1b2r2ù
1b2r2ú
1b2r2ā
1b2r2ī
1b2r2ĺ̥
1b2r2ŕ̥
1b2r2ū
1b2r2ḷ
1b2r2ḹ
1b2r2ṛ
1b2r2ṝ
1b2ṛ
1b2r̥
1b2u
1b2y2a
1b2y2e
1b2y2i
1b2y2ḷ
1b2y2l̥
1b2y2o
1b2y2ṛ
1b2y2r̥
1b2y2u
1b2y2à
1b2y2á
1b2y2è
1b2y2é
1b2y2ì
1b2y2í
1b2y2ò
1b2y2ó
1b2y2ù
1b2y2ú
1b2y2ā
1b2y2ī
1b2y2ĺ̥
1b2y2ŕ̥
1b2y2ū
1b2y2ḷ
1b2y2ḹ
1b2y2ṛ
1b2y2ṝ
1b2à
1b2á
1b2è
1b2é
1b2ì
1b2í
1b2ò
1b2ó
1b2ù
1b2ú
1b2ā
1b2ī
1b2ĺ̥
1b2ŕ̥
1b2ū
1b2ḷ
1b2ḹ
1b2ṛ
1b2ṝ
1c2a
1c2e
1c2h2a
1c2h2e
1c2h2i
1c2h2ḷ
1c2h2l̥
1c2h2o
1c2h2ṛ
1c2h2r̥
1c2h2u
1c2h2y2a
1c2h2y2e
1c2h2y2i
1c2h2y2ḷ
1c2h2y2l̥
1c2h2y2o
1c2h2y2ṛ
1c2h2y2r̥
1c2h2y2u
1c2h2y2à
1c2h2y2á
1c2h2y2è
1c2h2y2é
1c2h2y2ì
1c2h2y2í
1c2h2y2ò
1c2h2y2ó
1c2h2y2ù
1c2h2y2ú
1c2h2y2ā
1c2h2y2ī
1c2h2y2ĺ̥
1c2h2y2ŕ̥
1c2h2y2ū
1c2h2y2ḷ
1c2h2y2ḹ
1c2h2y2ṛ
1c2h2y2ṝ
1c2h2à
1c2h2á
1c2h2è
1c2h2é
1c2h2ì
1c2h2í
1c2h2ò
1c2h2ó
1c2h2ù
1c2h2ú
1c2h2ā
1c2h2ī
1c2h2ĺ̥
1c2h2ŕ̥
1c2h2ū
1c2h2ḷ
1c2h2ḹ
1c2h2ṛ
1c2h2ṝ
1c2i
1c2ḷ
1c2l̥
1c2o
1c2ṛ
1c2r̥
1c2u
1c2y2a
1c2y2e
1c2y2i
1c2y2ḷ
1c2y2l̥
1c2y2o
1c2y2ṛ
1c2y2r̥
1c2y2u
1c2y2à
1c2y2á
1c2y2è
1c2y2é
1c2y2ì
1c2y2í
1c2y2ò
1c2y2ó
1c2y2ù
1c2y2ú
1c2y2ā
1c2y2ī
1c2y2ĺ̥
1c2y2ŕ̥
1c2y2ū
1c2y2ḷ
1c2y2ḹ
1c2y2ṛ
1c2y2ṝ
1c2à
1c2á
1c2è
1c2é
1c2ì
1c2í
1c2ò
1c2ó
1c2ù
1c2ú
1c2ā
1c2ī
1c2ĺ̥
1c2ŕ̥
1c2ū
1c2ḷ
1c2ḹ
1c2ṛ
1c2ṝ
1d2a
1d2e
1d2h2a
1d2h2e
1d2h2i
1d2h2ḷ
1d2h2l̥
1d2h2m2a
1d2h2m2e
1d2h2m2i
1d2h2m2ḷ
1d2h2m2l̥
1d2h2m2o
1d2h2m2ṛ
1d2h2m2r̥
1d2h2m2u
1d2h2m2à
1d2h2m2á
1d2h2m2è
1d2h2m2é
1d2h2m2ì
1d2h2m2í
1d2h2m2ò
1d2h2m2ó
1d2h2m2ù
1d2h2m2ú
1d2h2m2ā
1d2h2m2ī
1d2h2m2ĺ̥
1d2h2m2ŕ̥
1d2h2m2ū
1d2h2m2ḷ
1d2h2m2ḹ
1d2h2m2ṛ
1d2h2m2ṝ
1d2h2o
1d2h2r2a
1d2h2r2e
1d2h2r2i
1d2h2r2ḷ
1d2h2r2l̥
1d2h2r2o
1d2h2r2ṛ
1d2h2r2r̥
1d2h2r2u
1d2h2r2à
1d2h2r2á
1d2h2r2è
1d2h2r2é
1d2h2r2ì
1d2h2r2í
1d2h2r2ò
1d2h2r2ó
1d2h2r2ù
1d2h2r2ú
1d2h2r2ā
1d2h2r2ī
1d2h2r2ĺ̥
1d2h2r2ŕ̥
1d2h2r2ū
1d2h2r2ḷ
1d2h2r2ḹ
1d2h2r2ṛ
1d2h2r2ṝ
1d2h2ṛ
1d2h2r̥
1d2h2u
1d2h2v2a
1d2h2v2e
1d2h2v2i
1d2h2v2ḷ
1d2h2v2l̥
1d2h2v2o
1d2h2v2r2a
1d2h2v2r2e
1d2h2v2r2i
1d2h2v2r2ḷ
1d2h2v2r2l̥
1d2h2v2r2o
1d2h2v2r2ṛ
1d2h2v2r2r̥
1d2h2v2r2u
1d2h2v2r2à
1d2h2v2r2á
1d2h2v2r2è
1d2h2v2r2é
1d2h2v2r2ì
1d2h2v2r2í
1d2h2v2r2ò
1d2h2v2r2ó
1d2h2v2r2ù
1d2h2v2r2ú
1d2h2v2r2ā
1d2h2v2r2ī
1d2h2v2r2ĺ̥
1d2h2v2r2ŕ̥
1d2h2v2r2ū
1d2h2v2r2ḷ
1d2h2v2r2ḹ
1d2h2v2r2ṛ
1d2h2v2r2ṝ
1d2h2v2ṛ
1d2h2v2r̥
1d2h2v2u
1d2h2v2à
1d2h2v2á
1d2h2v2è
1d2h2v2é
1d2h2v2ì
1d2h2v2í
1d2h2v2ò
1d2h2v2ó
1d2h2v2ù
1d2h2v2ú
1d2h2v2ā
1d2h2v2ī
1d2h2v2ĺ̥
1d2h2v2ŕ̥
1d2h2v2ū
1d2h2v2ḷ
1d2h2v2ḹ
1d2h2v2ṛ
1d2h2v2ṝ
1d2h2y2a
1d2h2y2e
1d2h2y2i
1d2h2y2ḷ
1d2h2y2l̥
1d2h2y2o
1d2h2y2ṛ
1d2h2y2r̥
1d2h2y2u
1d2h2y2à
1d2h2y2á
1d2h2y2è
1d2h2y2é
1d2h2y2ì
1d2h2y2í
1d2h2y2ò
1d2h2y2ó
1d2h2y2ù
1d2h2y2ú
1d2h2y2ā
1d2h2y2ī
1d2h2y2ĺ̥
1d2h2y2ŕ̥
1d2h2y2ū
1d2h2y2ḷ
1d2h2y2ḹ
1d2h2y2ṛ
1d2h2y2ṝ
1d2h2à
1d2h2á
1d2h2è
1d2h2é
1d2h2ì
1d2h2í
1d2h2ò
1d2h2ó
1d2h2ù
1d2h2ú
1d2h2ā
1d2h2ī
1d2h2ĺ̥
1d2h2ŕ̥
1d2h2ū
1d2h2ḷ
1d2h2ḹ
1d2h2ṛ
1d2h2ṝ
1d2i
1d2ḷ
1d2l̥
1d2o
1d2r2a
1d2r2e
1d2r2i
1d2r2ḷ
1d2r2l̥
1d2r2o
1d2r2ṛ
1d2r2r̥
1d2r2u
1d2r2v2a
1d2r2v2e
1d2r2v2i
1d2r2v2ḷ
1d2r2v2l̥
1d2r2v2o
1d2r2v2ṛ
1d2r2v2r̥
1d2r2v2u
1d2r2v2à
1d2r2v2á
1d2r2v2è
1d2r2v2é
1d2r2v2ì
1d2r2v2í
1d2r2v2ò
1d2r2v2ó
1d2r2v2ù
1d2r2v2ú
1d2r2v2ā
1d2r2v2ī
1d2r2v2ĺ̥
1d2r2v2ŕ̥
1d2r2v2ū
1d2r2v2ḷ
1d2r2v2ḹ
1d2r2v2ṛ
1d2r2v2ṝ
1d2r2à
1d2r2á
1d2r2è
1d2r2é
1d2r2ì
1d2r2í
1d2r2ò
1d2r2ó
1d2r2ù
1d2r2ú
1d2r2ā
1d2r2ī
1d2r2ĺ̥
1d2r2ŕ̥
1d2r2ū
1d2r2ḷ
1d2r2ḹ
1d2r2ṛ
1d2r2ṝ
1d2ṛ
1d2r̥
1d2u
1d2v2a
1d2v2e
1d2v2i
1d2v2ḷ
1d2v2l̥
1d2v2o
1d2v2ṛ
1d2v2r̥
1d2v2u
1d2v2y2a
1d2v2y2e
1d2v2y2i
1d2v2y2ḷ
1d2v2y2l̥
1d2v2y2o
1d2v2y2ṛ
1d2v2y2r̥
1d2v2y2u
1d2v2y2à
1d2v2y2á
1d2v2y2è
1d2v2y2é
1d2v2y2ì
1d2v2y2í
1d2v2y2ò
1d2v2y2ó
1d2v2y2ù
1d2v2y2ú
1d2v2y2ā
1d2v2y2ī
1d2v2y2ĺ̥
1d2v2y2ŕ̥
1d2v2y2ū
1d2v2y2ḷ
1d2v2y2ḹ
1d2v2y2ṛ
1d2v2y2ṝ
1d2v2à
1d2v2á
1d2v2è
1d2v2é
1d2v2ì
1d2v2í
1d2v2ò
1d2v2ó
1d2v2ù
1d2v2ú
1d2v2ā
1d2v2ī
1d2v2ĺ̥
1d2v2ŕ̥
1d2v2ū
1d2v2ḷ
1d2v2ḹ
1d2v2ṛ
1d2v2ṝ
1d2y2a
1d2y2e
1d2y2i
1d2y2ḷ
1d2y2l̥
1d2y2o
1d2y2ṛ
1d2y2r̥
1d2y2u
1d2y2à
1d2y2á
1d2y2è
1d2y2é
1d2y2ì
1d2y2í
1d2y2ò
1d2y2ó
1d2y2ù
1d2y2ú
1d2y2ā
1d2y2ī
1d2y2ĺ̥
1d2y2ŕ̥
1d2y2ū
1d2y2ḷ
1d2y2ḹ
1d2y2ṛ
1d2y2ṝ
1d2à
1d2á
1d2è
1d2é
1d2ì
1d2í
1d2ò
1d2ó
1d2ù
1d2ú
1d2ā
1d2ī
1d2ĺ̥
1d2ŕ̥
1d2ū
1d2̣2a
1d2̣2e
1d2̣2h2a
1d2̣2h2e
1d2̣2h2i
1d2̣2h2ḷ
1d2̣2h2l̥
1d2̣2h2o
1d2̣2h2ṛ
1d2̣2h2r̥
1d2̣2h2u
1d2̣2h2à
1d2̣2h2á
1d2̣2h2è
1d2̣2h2é
1d2̣2h2ì
1d2̣2h2í
1d2̣2h2ò
1d2̣2h2ó
1d2̣2h2ù
1d2̣2h2ú
1d2̣2h2ā
1d2̣2h2ī
1d2̣2h2ĺ̥
1d2̣2h2ŕ̥
1d2̣2h2ū
1d2̣2h2ḷ
1d2̣2h2ḹ
1d2̣2h2ṛ
1d2̣2h2ṝ
1d2̣2i
1d2̣2ḷ
1d2̣2l̥
1d2̣2o
1d2̣2ṛ
1d2̣2r̥
1d2̣2u
1d2̣2v2a
1d2̣2v2e
1d2̣2v2i
1d2̣2v2ḷ
1d2̣2v2l̥
1d2̣2v2o
1d2̣2v2ṛ
1d2̣2v2r̥
1d2̣2v2u
1d2̣2v2à
1d2̣2v2á
1d2̣2v2è
1d2̣2v2é
1d2̣2v2ì
1d2̣2v2í
1d2̣2v2ò
1d2̣2v2ó
1d2̣2v2ù
1d2̣2v2ú
1d2̣2v2ā
1d2̣2v2ī
1d2̣2v2ĺ̥
1d2̣2v2ŕ̥
1d2̣2v2ū
1d2̣2v2ḷ
1d2̣2v2ḹ
1d2̣2v2ṛ
1d2̣2v2ṝ
1d2̣2à
1d2̣2á
1d2̣2è
1d2̣2é
1d2̣2ì
1d2̣2í
1d2̣2ò
1d2̣2ó
1d2̣2ù
1d2̣2ú
1d2̣2ā
1d2̣2ī
1d2̣2ĺ̥
1d2̣2ŕ̥
1d2̣2ū
1d2̣2ḷ
1d2̣2ḹ
1d2̣2ṛ
1d2̣2ṝ
1d2ḷ
1d2ḹ
1d2ṛ
1d2ṝ
1g2a
1g2d2h2a
1g2d2h2e
1g2d2h2i
1g2d2h2ḷ
1g2d2h2l̥
1g2d2h2o
1g2d2h2ṛ
1g2d2h2r̥
1g2d2h2u
1g2d2h2à
1g2d2h2á
1g2d2h2è
1g2d2h2é
1g2d2h2ì
1g2d2h2í
1g2d2h2ò
1g2d2h2ó
1g2d2h2ù
1g2d2h2ú
1g2d2h2ā
1g2d2h2ī
1g2d2h2ĺ̥
1g2d2h2ŕ̥
1g2d2h2ū
1g2d2h2ḷ
1g2d2h2ḹ
1g2d2h2ṛ
1g2d2h2ṝ
1g2e
1g2h2a
1g2h2e
1g2h2i
1g2h2ḷ
1g2h2l̥
1g2h2n2a
1g2h2n2e
1g2h2n2i
1g2h2n2ḷ
1g2h2n2l̥
1g2h2n2o
1g2h2n2ṛ
1g2h2n2r̥
1g2h2n2u
1g2h2n2y2a
1g2h2n2y2e
1g2h2n2y2i
1g2h2n2y2ḷ
1g2h2n2y2l̥
1g2h2n2y2o
1g2h2n2y2ṛ
1g2h2n2y2r̥
1g2h2n2y2u
1g2h2n2y2à
1g2h2n2y2á
1g2h2n2y2è
1g2h2n2y2é
1g2h2n2y2ì
1g2h2n2y2í
1g2h2n2y2ò
1g2h2n2y2ó
1g2h2n2y2ù
1g2h2n2y2ú
1g2h2n2y2ā
1g2h2n2y2ī
1g2h2n2y2ĺ̥
1g2h2n2y2ŕ̥
1g2h2n2y2ū
1g2h2n2y2ḷ
1g2h2n2y2ḹ
1g2h2n2y2ṛ
1g2h2n2y2ṝ
1g2h2n2à
1g2h2n2á
1g2h2n2è
1g2h2n2é
1g2h2n2ì
1g2h2n2í
1g2h2n2ò
1g2h2n2ó
1g2h2n2ù
1g2h2n2ú
1g2h2n2ā
1g2h2n2ī
1g2h2n2ĺ̥
1g2h2n2ŕ̥
1g2h2n2ū
1g2h2n2ḷ
1g2h2n2ḹ
1g2h2n2ṛ
1g2h2n2ṝ
1g2h2o
1g2h2r2a
1g2h2r2e
1g2h2r2i
1g2h2r2ḷ
1g2h2r2l̥
1g2h2r2o
1g2h2r2ṛ
1g2h2r2r̥
1g2h2r2u
1g2h2r2à
1g2h2r2á
1g2h2r2è
1g2h2r2é
1g2h2r2ì
1g2h2r2í
1g2h2r2ò
1g2h2r2ó
1g2h2r2ù
1g2h2r2ú
1g2h2r2ā
1g2h2r2ī
1g2h2r2ĺ̥
1g2h2r2ŕ̥
1g2h2r2ū
1g2h2r2ḷ
1g2h2r2ḹ
1g2h2r2ṛ
1g2h2r2ṝ
1g2h2ṛ
1g2h2r̥
1g2h2u
1g2h2à
1g2h2á
1g2h2è
1g2h2é
1g2h2ì
1g2h2í
1g2h2ò
1g2h2ó
1g2h2ù
1g2h2ú
1g2h2ā
1g2h2ī
1g2h2ĺ̥
1g2h2ŕ̥
1g2h2ū
1g2h2ḷ
1g2h2ḹ
1g2h2ṛ
1g2h2ṝ
1g2i
1g2l2a
1g2l2e
1g2l2i
1g2l2ḷ
1g2l2l̥
1g2l2o
1g2l2ṛ
1g2l2r̥
1g2l2u
1g2l2à
1g2l2á
1g2l2è
1g2l2é
1g2l2ì
1g2l2í
1g2l2ò
1g2l2ó
1g2l2ù
1g2l2ú
1g2l2ā
1g2l2ī
1g2l2ĺ̥
1g2l2ŕ̥
1g2l2ū
1g2l2ḷ
1g2l2ḹ
1g2l2ṛ
1g2l2ṝ
1g2ḷ
1g2l̥
1g2m2a
1g2m2e
1g2m2i
1g2m2ḷ
1g2m2l̥
1g2m2o
1g2m2ṛ
1g2m2r̥
1g2m2u
1g2m2à
1g2m2á
1g2m2è
1g2m2é
1g2m2ì
1g2m2í
1g2m2ò
1g2m2ó
1g2m2ù
1g2m2ú
1g2m2ā
1g2m2ī
1g2m2ĺ̥
1g2m2ŕ̥
1g2m2ū
1g2m2ḷ
1g2m2ḹ
1g2m2ṛ
1g2m2ṝ
1g2n2a
1g2n2e
1g2n2i
1g2n2ḷ
1g2n2l̥
1g2n2o
1g2n2ṛ
1g2n2r̥
1g2n2u
1g2n2à
1g2n2á
1g2n2è
1g2n2é
1g2n2ì
1g2n2í
1g2n2ò
1g2n2ó
1g2n2ù
1g2n2ú
1g2n2ā
1g2n2ī
1g2n2ĺ̥
1g2n2ŕ̥
1g2n2ū
1g2n2ḷ
1g2n2ḹ
1g2n2ṛ
1g2n2ṝ
1g2o
1g2r2a
1g2r2e
1g2r2i
1g2r2ḷ
1g2r2l̥
1g2r2o
1g2r2ṛ
1g2r2r̥
1g2r2u
1g2r2à
1g2r2á
1g2r2è
1g2r2é
1g2r2ì
1g2r2í
1g2r2ò
1g2r2ó
1g2r2ù
1g2r2ú
1g2r2ā
1g2r2ī
1g2r2ĺ̥
1g2r2ŕ̥
1g2r2ū
1g2r2ḷ
1g2r2ḹ
1g2r2ṛ
1g2r2ṝ
1g2ṛ
1g2r̥
1g2u
1g2v2a
1g2v2e
1g2v2i
1g2v2ḷ
1g2v2l̥
1g2v2o
1g2v2ṛ
1g2v2r̥
1g2v2u
1g2v2à
1g2v2á
1g2v2è
1g2v2é
1g2v2ì
1g2v2í
1g2v2ò
1g2v2ó
1g2v2ù
1g2v2ú
1g2v2ā
1g2v2ī
1g2v2ĺ̥
1g2v2ŕ̥
1g2v2ū
1g2v2ḷ
1g2v2ḹ
1g2v2ṛ
1g2v2ṝ
1g2à
1g2á
1g2è
1g2é
1g2ì
1g2í
1g2ò
1g2ó
1g2ù
1g2ú
1g2ā
1g2ī
1g2ĺ̥
1g2ŕ̥
1g2ū
1g2ḷ
1g2ḹ
1g2ṛ
1g2ṝ
1h2a
1h2e
1h2i
1h2l2a
1h2l2e
1h2l2i
1h2l2ḷ
1h2l2l̥
1h2l2o
1h2l2ṛ
1h2l2r̥
1h2l2u
1h2l2à
1h2l2á
1h2l2è
1h2l2é
1h2l2ì
1h2l2í
1h2l2ò
1h2l2ó
1h2l2ù
1h2l2ú
1h2l2ā
1h2l2ī
1h2l2ĺ̥
1h2l2ŕ̥
1h2l2ū
1h2l2ḷ
1h2l2ḹ
1h2l2ṛ
1h2l2ṝ
1h2ḷ
1h2l̥
1h2m2a
1h2m2e
1h2m2i
1h2m2ḷ
1h2m2l̥
1h2m2o
1h2m2ṛ
1h2m2r̥
1h2m2u
1h2m2à
1h2m2á
1h2m2è
1h2m2é
1h2m2ì
1h2m2í
1h2m2ò
1h2m2ó
1h2m2ù
1h2m2ú
1h2m2ā
1h2m2ī
1h2m2ĺ̥
1h2m2ŕ̥
1h2m2ū
1h2m2ḷ
1h2m2ḹ
1h2m2ṛ
1h2m2ṝ
1h2n2a
1h2n2e
1h2n2i
1h2n2ḷ
1h2n2l̥
1h2n2o
1h2n2ṛ
1h2n2r̥
1h2n2u
1h2n2à
1h2n2á
1h2n2è
1h2n2é
1h2n2ì
1h2n2í
1h2n2ò
1h2n2ó
1h2n2ù
1h2n2ú
1h2n2ā
1h2n2ī
1h2n2ĺ̥
1h2n2ŕ̥
1h2n2ū
1h2n2ḷ
1h2n2ḹ
1h2n2ṛ
1h2n2ṝ
1h2o
1h2r2a
1h2r2e
1h2r2i
1h2r2ḷ
1h2r2l̥
1h2r2o
1h2r2ṛ
1h2r2r̥
1h2r2u
1h2r2à
1h2r2á
1h2r2è
1h2r2é
1h2r2ì
1h2r2í
1h2r2ò
1h2r2ó
1h2r2ù
1h2r2ú
1h2r2ā
1h2r2ī
1h2r2ĺ̥
1h2r2ŕ̥
1h2r2ū
1h2r2ḷ
1h2r2ḹ
1h2r2ṛ
1h2r2ṝ
1h2ṛ
1h2r̥
1h2u
1h2v2a
1h2v2e
1h2v2i
1h2v2ḷ
1h2v2l̥
1h2v2o
1h2v2ṛ
1h2v2r̥
1h2v2u
1h2v2à
1h2v2á
1h2v2è
1h2v2é
1h2v2ì
1h2v2í
1h2v2ò
1h2v2ó
1h2v2ù
1h2v2ú
1h2v2ā
1h2v2ī
1h2v2ĺ̥
1h2v2ŕ̥
1h2v2ū
1h2v2ḷ
1h2v2ḹ
1h2v2ṛ
1h2v2ṝ
1h2y2a
1h2y2e
1h2y2i
1h2y2ḷ
1h2y2l̥
1h2y2o
1h2y2ṛ
1h2y2r̥
1h2y2u
1h2y2à
1h2y2á
1h2y2è
1h2y2é
1h2y2ì
1h2y2í
1h2y2ò
1h2y2ó
1h2y2ù
1h2y2ú
1h2y2ā
1h2y2ī
1h2y2ĺ̥
1h2y2ŕ̥
1h2y2ū
1h2y2ḷ
1h2y2ḹ
1h2y2ṛ
1h2y2ṝ
1h2à
1h2á
1h2è
1h2é
1h2ì
1h2í
1h2ò
1h2ó
1h2ù
1h2ú
1h2ā
1h2ī
1h2ĺ̥
1h2ŕ̥
1h2ū
1h2ḷ
1h2ḹ
1h2ṛ
1h2ṝ
1j2a
1j2e
1j2h2a
1j2h2e
1j2h2i
1j2h2ḷ
1j2h2l̥
1j2h2o
1j2h2ṛ
1j2h2r̥
1j2h2u
1j2h2y2a
1j2h2y2e
1j2h2y2i
1j2h2y2ḷ
1j2h2y2l̥
1j2h2y2o
1j2h2y2ṛ
1j2h2y2r̥
1j2h2y2u
1j2h2y2à
1j2h2y2á
1j2h2y2è
1j2h2y2é
1j2h2y2ì
1j2h2y2í
1j2h2y2ò
1j2h2y2ó
1j2h2y2ù
1j2h2y2ú
1j2h2y2ā
1j2h2y2ī
1j2h2y2ĺ̥
1j2h2y2ŕ̥
1j2h2y2ū
1j2h2y2ḷ
1j2h2y2ḹ
1j2h2y2ṛ
1j2h2y2ṝ
1j2h2à
1j2h2á
1j2h2è
1j2h2é
1j2h2ì
1j2h2í
1j2h2ò
1j2h2ó
1j2h2ù
1j2h2ú
1j2h2ā
1j2h2ī
1j2h2ĺ̥
1j2h2ŕ̥
1j2h2ū
1j2h2ḷ
1j2h2ḹ
1j2h2ṛ
1j2h2ṝ
1j2i
1j2ḷ
1j2l̥
1j2m2a
1j2m2e
1j2m2i
1j2m2ḷ
1j2m2l̥
1j2m2o
1j2m2ṛ
1j2m2r̥
1j2m2u
1j2m2à
1j2m2á
1j2m2è
1j2m2é
1j2m2ì
1j2m2í
1j2m2ò
1j2m2ó
1j2m2ù
1j2m2ú
1j2m2ā
1j2m2ī
1j2m2ĺ̥
1j2m2ŕ̥
1j2m2ū
1j2m2ḷ
1j2m2ḹ
1j2m2ṛ
1j2m2ṝ
1j2n2̃2a
1j2n2̃2e
1j2n2̃2i
1j2n2̃2ḷ
1j2n2̃2l̥
1j2n2̃2o
1j2n2̃2ṛ
1j2n2̃2r̥
1j2n2̃2u
1j2n2̃2à
1j2n2̃2á
1j2n2̃2è
1j2n2̃2é
1j2n2̃2ì
1j2n2̃2í
1j2n2̃2ò
1j2n2̃2ó
1j2n2̃2ù
1j2n2̃2ú
1j2n2̃2ā
1j2n2̃2ī
1j2n2̃2ĺ̥
1j2n2̃2ŕ̥
1j2n2̃2ū
1j2n2̃2ḷ
1j2n2̃2ḹ
1j2n2̃2ṛ
1j2n2̃2ṝ
1j2o
1j2r2a
1j2r2e
1j2r2i
1j2r2ḷ
1j2r2l̥
1j2r2o
1j2r2ṛ
1j2r2r̥
1j2r2u
1j2r2à
1j2r2á
1j2r2è
1j2r2é
1j2r2ì
1j2r2í
1j2r2ò
1j2r2ó
1j2r2ù
1j2r2ú
1j2r2ā
1j2r2ī
1j2r2ĺ̥
1j2r2ŕ̥
1j2r2ū
1j2r2ḷ
1j2r2ḹ
1j2r2ṛ
1j2r2ṝ
1j2ṛ
1j2r̥
1j2u
1j2v2a
1j2v2e
1j2v2i
1j2v2ḷ
1j2v2l̥
1j2v2o
1j2v2ṛ
1j2v2r̥
1j2v2u
1j2v2à
1j2v2á
1j2v2è
1j2v2é
1j2v2ì
1j2v2í
1j2v2ò
1j2v2ó
1j2v2ù
1j2v2ú
1j2v2ā
1j2v2ī
1j2v2ĺ̥
1j2v2ŕ̥
1j2v2ū
1j2v2ḷ
1j2v2ḹ
1j2v2ṛ
1j2v2ṝ
1j2y2a
1j2y2e
1j2y2i
1j2y2ḷ
1j2y2l̥
1j2y2o
1j2y2ṛ
1j2y2r̥
1j2y2u
1j2y2à
1j2y2á
1j2y2è
1j2y2é
1j2y2ì
1j2y2í
1j2y2ò
1j2y2ó
1j2y2ù
1j2y2ú
1j2y2ā
1j2y2ī
1j2y2ĺ̥
1j2y2ŕ̥
1j2y2ū
1j2y2ḷ
1j2y2ḹ
1j2y2ṛ
1j2y2ṝ
1j2à
1j2á
1j2è
1j2é
1j2ì
1j2í
1j2ñ2a
1j2ñ2e
1j2ñ2i
1j2ñ2ḷ
1j2ñ2l̥
1j2ñ2o
1j2ñ2ṛ
1j2ñ2r̥
1j2ñ2u
1j2ñ2à
1j2ñ2á
1j2ñ2è
1j2ñ2é
1j2ñ2ì
1j2ñ2í
1j2ñ2ò
1j2ñ2ó
1j2ñ2ù
1j2ñ2ú
1j2ñ2ā
1j2ñ2ī
1j2ñ2ĺ̥
1j2ñ2ŕ̥
1j2ñ2ū
1j2ñ2ḷ
1j2ñ2ḹ
1j2ñ2ṛ
1j2ñ2ṝ
1j2ò
1j2ó
1j2ù
